Vermont, session 2025-2026, H754.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 11b is added to read:
§ 11b. REPEAT VIOLENT OFFENDER
(a) As used in this section, “felony crime of violence” means a felony, an
element of which involves an act of violence against another person.
(b) The State may elect to seek the substitute penalty as set forth in this
section against a person who, after having been at least two times convicted of
a felony crime of violence, is convicted of a third felony crime of violence.
(c) If the State seeks a substitute penalty for a felony crime of violence, it
shall give notice to the defendant by filing an information seeking the penalty
contained in this section.
(d) A person charged under this section shall be sentenced upon conviction
of such third or subsequent offense to imprisonment of not less than three
years, up to and including life.
(e) The three-year minimum term of imprisonment provided by this section
shall be served and shall not be suspended, deferred, or served as a supervised
sentence. The defendant shall not be eligible for probation, parole, furlough,
or any other type of early release until the expiration of the three-year term of
imprisonment.
(f) For the purposes of this section, multiple convictions that arise out of
the same criminal transaction shall be treated as one conviction.
VT LEG #385336 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.754
2026 Page 3 of 8
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 1028 is amended to read:
§ 1028. ASSAULT OF PROTECTED PROFESSIONAL; ASSAULT WITH
BODILY FLUIDS
(a)(1) A person convicted of a simple or aggravated assault against a
protected professional as defined in subdivision (d)(1) of this section while the
protected professional is performing a lawful duty, or with the intent to prevent
the protected professional from performing his or her the professional’s lawful
duty, in addition to any other penalties imposed under sections 1023 and 1024
of this title, shall:
(1)(A) for the first offense, be imprisoned not less than 90 days and
not more than one year or fined not more than $2,500.00, or both;
(2)(B) for the second offense and each subsequent offenses offense,
be imprisoned not less than one year and not more than 10 years or fined not
more than $5,000.00, or both.
(2) A person convicted of aggravated assault against a protected
professional as defined in subdivision (d)(1) of this section while the protected
professional is performing a lawful duty, or with the intent to prevent the
protected professional from performing the professional’s lawful duty, in
addition to any other penalties imposed under sections 1023 and 1024 of this
title, shall be imprisoned not less than two years and not more than seven
years, fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #385336 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.754
2026 Page 4 of 8
(b)(1) No person shall intentionally cause blood, vomitus, excrement,
mucus, saliva, semen, or urine to come in contact with a protected professional
while the person professional is performing a lawful duty.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more
than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(c) In imposing a sentence under this section, the court shall take into
consideration whether the defendant was a patient at the time of the offense
and had a psychiatric illness, the symptoms of which were exacerbated by the
surrounding circumstances, irrespective of whether the illness constituted an
affirmative defense to the charge.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Protected professional” shall mean means a law enforcement
officer; a firefighter; a health care worker; an employee, contractor, or grantee
of the Department for Children and Families; or any emergency medical
personnel as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2651(6).
(2) “Health care facility” shall have has the same meaning as defined in
18 V.S.A. § 9432(8).
(3) “Health care worker” means an employee of a health care facility or
a licensed physician who is on the medical staff of a health care facility who
provides direct care to patients or who is part of a team-response team response
to a patient or visitor incident involving real or potential violence.
VT LEG #385336 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.754
2026 Page 5 of 8
(e) This section shall not apply to an individual under 18 years of age
residing in a residential rehabilitation facility.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 5321 is amended to read:
§ 5321. APPEARANCE BY VICTIM
(a) The victim of a crime has the following rights in any sentencing
proceedings concerning the person convicted of that crime, or in the event a
proposed plea agreement filed with the court recommends a deferred sentence,
at any change of plea hearing concerning the person charged with committing
that crime:
(1) to be given advance notice by the prosecutor’s office of the date of
the proceedings; and
(2) to appear, personally, to express reasonably his or her the victim’s
views concerning the crime, the person convicted, and the need for restitution.
(b) The change of plea hearing or sentencing shall not be delayed or voided
by reason of the failure to give the victim the required notice or the failure of
the victim to appear Upon the request of a victim of a listed crime, prior to the
acceptance by the court of a plea of a defendant pursuant to a proposed plea
agreement, the prosecutor shall provide such victim with the terms of the
proposed plea agreement in writing. If the prosecutor’s office is unable to
notify the victim, the prosecutor shall sign a statement indicating such and the
attempts that were made to comply with this subsection. If the terms of the
VT LEG #385336 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.754
2026 Page 6 of 8
proposed plea agreement provide for a term of imprisonment that is more than
two years or a total effective sentence of more than a two-year term of
imprisonment, the prosecutor’s office shall indicate:
(1) the maximum period of imprisonment that may apply to the
defendant;
(2) whether the defendant may be eligible to earn risk reduction credits;
and
(3) whether the defendant may be eligible to apply for release on
probation, furlough, or parole.
(c) In accordance with court rules, at the sentencing or change of plea
hearing, the court shall ask if the victim is present and, if so, whether the
victim would like to be heard regarding sentencing or the proposed deferral of
sentencing. In imposing the sentence or considering whether to defer
sentencing, the court shall consider any views offered at the hearing by the
victim. The statement may include the victim’s opinion of any plea agreement.
If the victim is not present, the court shall ask whether the victim has
expressed, either orally or in writing, views regarding sentencing or the
proposed deferral of sentencing and shall take those views into consideration in
imposing the sentence or considering whether to defer sentencing.
(d) At or before the sentencing hearing, the prosecutor’s office shall
instruct the victim of a listed crime, in all cases where in which the court
VT LEG #385336 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.754
2026 Page 7 of 8
imposes a sentence that includes a period of incarceration, that a sentence of
incarceration is to the custody of the Commissioner of Corrections and that the
Commissioner of Corrections has the authority to affect the actual time the
defendant shall serve in incarceration through earned time credit, furlough,
work-release work release, and other early release programs. In addition, the
prosecutor’s office shall explain the significance of a minimum and maximum
sentence to the victim, explain the function of parole and how it may affect the
actual amount of time the defendant may be incarcerated, and inform the
victim of the maximum amount of earned time that the defendant could accrue
and that earned time only affects when a defendant is eligible for parole
consideration but does not necessarily result in the defendant’s release.
(e) At or before a change of plea hearing where the plea agreement filed
with the court proposes a deferred sentence, the prosecutor’s office shall
instruct the victim of a listed crime about the significance of a deferred
sentence and the potential consequences of a violation of conditions imposed
by the court. In addition, the prosecutor’s office shall consult with the victim
concerning any proposed probation conditions prior to the hearing.
(f) The prosecutor’s office shall use all reasonable efforts to keep the
victim informed and consult with the victim throughout the plea agreement
negotiation process in any case involving a victim of a listed crime.
VT LEG #385336 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.754
2026 Page 8 of 8
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385336 v.2